Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,118
Judge; qualifications.

No person shall be eligible to the office of judge of a separate juvenile court unless he or she (1) is thirty years of age, (2) is a citizen of the United States, (3) has been engaged in the practice of law in the State of Nebraska for at least five years, which may include prior service as a judge, (4) is currently admitted to practice before the Nebraska Supreme Court, and (5) is, on the effective date of appointment, a resident of the district to be served, and remains a resident of such district during the period of service.

Laws 1959, c. 189, § 6, p. 685;

Laws 1979, LB 237, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 43-233;

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 75.